Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS APPLYING TO HEALTH PROFESSIONS GENERALLY

CHAPTER 106. GENERAL REGULATORY AUTHORITY REGARDING HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONERS' USE OF INTERNET

Sec. 106.001. EFFECT OF INTERNET ACTIVITY. (a) In this section:

(1) "Licensing authority" means a department, commission, board, office, or other agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state that regulates activities and persons under this title.

(2) "Internet" has the meaning assigned by Section 2002.001, Government Code.

(b) The fact that an activity occurs through the use of the Internet does not affect a licensing authority's power to regulate an activity or person that would otherwise be regulated under this title.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 286, Sec. 1, eff. May. 23, 2001. Renumbered from Occupations Code Sec. 105.001 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(113), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.